Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1209
Tax; delinquent; action.

The Tax Commissioner may bring an action against any person engaged in the severing of uranium for the collection of taxes which are due and delinquent under sections 57-1201 to 57-1214.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 21.